District of Columbia statutes.
28-4524

Unfair trade practice.

The secret payment or allowance of rebates, refunds, commissions, or unearned discounts for cigarettes, whether in the form of money or otherwise, or secretly extending to certain purchasers of cigarettes special services or privileges not extended to all purchasers of cigarettes, upon like terms and conditions, to the injury of a competitor, and where such payment or allowance tends to destroy competition, is an unfair trade practice. Any wholesaler or retailer of cigarettes resorting to such an unfair trade practice shall be subject to the penalties provided in § 28-4525.

Mar. 22, 1994, D.C. Law 10-89, § 2(b), 41 DCR 489
This section is referenced in § 28-4526.
1981 Ed., § 28-4524.